Oklahoma, session 2025, SB881.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 10, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20J), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 20J. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class B5


shall include the following criminal offenses:


1. Second or subsequent conviction for assault and battery


against a current or former intimate partner or a family or

Req. No. 480 Page 1


household member, as provided for in subsection C of Section 644 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. Second or subsequent conviction for domestic abuse committed


in the presence of a child, as provided for in subsection G of


Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Assault and battery by strangulation or attempted


strangulation against an intimate partner or a family or household


member, as provided for in subsection J of Section 644 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Aggravated assault and battery, as provided for in Section


646 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. Battery or assault and battery upon a police officer,


sheriff, deputy sheriff, highway patrolman, corrections personnel,


or other state peace officer, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 649 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Striking or mistreating a police dog or police horse during


the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided for in


subsection D of Section 649.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. Disfiguring, disabling, or killing a police dog or police


horse during the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided


for in subsection C of Section 649.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


8. Battery or assault and battery resulting in bodily injury to


any employee of the Office of Juvenile Affairs or residential

Req. No. 480 Page 2


facility, as provided for in subsection E of Section 650.2 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


9. Assault with intent to kill, as provided for in Section 653


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. Assault with intent to commit any felony, as provided for


in Section 681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


11. Manslaughter in the second degree, as provided for in


Section 716 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


12. Owning a mischievous animal that kills a human being, as


provided for in Section 717 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


13. Causing, aiding, abetting, or encouraging a minor to commit


or participate in committing a felony offense, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 856 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


14. Causing, aiding, abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or


recruiting a minor to participate, join, or associate with any


criminal street gang, as provided for in subsection D of Section 856


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


15. Committing a gang-related offense as a condition of


membership in a criminal street gang, as provided for in Section


856.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


16. Stalking, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1173


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


17. Second or subsequent conviction of stalking or committing


the act of stalking within ten (10) years of the completion of

Req. No. 480 Page 3


sentence for a prior conviction of stalking, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1173 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


18. Intentionally or recklessly spreading an infectious


disease, as provided for in Section 1192.1 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


19. Entering the premises of another while masked or disguised


with the intent to inflict bodily injury or injury to property, as


provided for in Section 1302 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


20. 19. Assault with a dangerous weapon while masked or in


disguise, as provided for in Section 1303 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


21. 20. Unlawful assembly for the purpose of engaging in a


riot, as provided for in Section 1320.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


22. 21. Acts of cruelty to animals, as provided for in Section


1685 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


23. 22. Instigating or encouraging any cockfight, as provided


for in Section 1692.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


24. 23. Keeping a pit or other place or knowingly providing


equipment or facilities for cockfighting, as provided for in Section


1692.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


25. 24. Servicing or facilitating a cockfight, as provided for


in Section 1692.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 4


26. 25. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any bird for


cockfighting, as provided for in Section 1692.5 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


27. 26. Failing to stop for an accident resulting in a nonfatal


injury to another person, as provided for in Section 10-102 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


28. 27. Personal injury accident while driving or operating a


motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating


substance while having a previous conviction for driving or


operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or


other intoxicating substance, as provided for in paragraph 2 of


subsection A of Section 11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


29. 28. Failure to register as a sex offender, as provided for


in Section 583 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


30. 29. Furnishing false or misleading information in the


registration required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as


provided for in Section 586 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


31. 30. Failure to comply with the Sex Offenders Registration


Act, as provided for in subsection A of Section 587 of Title 57 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


32. 31. Failure to comply with established guidelines of


global-positioning-system (GPS) monitoring pursuant to the


provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 587 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 5


33. 32. Temporarily or permanently residing within a two-


thousand-foot radius of a public or private school site or other


listed places by a person required to register pursuant to the Sex


Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in subsection A of


Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


34. 33. Residing with a minor child after being convicted of an


offense that involved a minor child by a person required to register


pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


35. 34. Two or more sex offenders residing together in a


dwelling during the term of registration as a sex offender, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; and


36. 35. Establishing, leasing, operating, or owning any


structure where persons required to register pursuant to the Sex


Offenders Registration Act are allowed to reside, as provided for in


subsection E of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person convicted of a Class B5 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the


corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 14, Chapter 366, O.S.L.


2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 20N), is amended to read as


follows:



Req. No. 480 Page 6


Section 20N. A. Upon the effective date of this act, Class D1


shall include the following criminal offenses:


1. Public warehouse and/or commodity stock fraud, as provided


for in Section 9-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. False issuance of warehouse receipt, as provided for in


Section 9-35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Misrepresentation of charter, as provided for in Section 9-


of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Tampering with anhydrous equipment, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. Willfully burn forest, grass, crops, or woodlands, as


provided for in Section 16-25 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Willful and unlawful burning of forest, grass, croplands,


rangeland, or other wild lands by owner, as provided for in Section


16-28.1 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. Possession of incendiary device with the intent to burn, as


provided for in Section 16-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. Operate aircraft not registered with the Federal Aviation


Administration Office of Aircraft Registry or foreign country, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 258 of Title 3 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


9. Supply false information in regard to aircraft ownership, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 258 of Title 3 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 7


10. Concealing identity of aircraft, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 258 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


11. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 259 of Title 3 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


12. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft


with intent to conceal, as provided for in subsection B of Section


259 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


13. Sell, purchase, or possess aircraft with removed or


falsified identification number with intent to misrepresent the


identity of aircraft, as provided for in subsection D of Section 259


of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


14. Operating aircraft under the influence of alcohol, second


or subsequent offense within ten (10) years, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


15. Operating aircraft under the influence of intoxicant,


second or subsequent offense with ten (10) years, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


16. Unauthorized use of aircraft, as provided for in subsection


A of Section 321 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


17. Charge fee for horse race without a license, as provided


for in Section 205 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


18. Pari-mutuel wagering without a license, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 208.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 8


19. Entering racehorse under false name, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


20. Entering racehorse without name being registered, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


21. Using racing stimulating devices, as provided for in


Section 208.7 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


22. Racetrack bribery or ticket falsification, as provided for


in Section 208.8 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


23. Unauthorized wagering on horse racing, as provided for in


Section 208.9 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


24. Falsification of information on racehorse, as provided for


in Section 208.10 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


25. Administer a drug or medication without authorization to


horse prior to racing, as provided for in subsection C of Section


208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


26. Violation of horse racing drug provisions, as provided for


in subsection D of Section 208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


27. Forging and/or counterfeiting state lottery ticket, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 727 of Title 3A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


28. Influence lottery win by fraud, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 727 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 9


29. Own dog that attacks and kills a person, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


30. Release dog on law enforcement officer, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


31. Pledging assets of bank as collateral, as provided in


Section 809 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


32. Unlawful compensation of bank officer, as provided for in


Section 1405 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


33. Receipt of deposits while insolvent, as provided for in


Section 1406 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


34. Unlawful service as bank officer or director, as provided


for in Section 1407 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


35. Serving as bank commissioner, administrative assistant, or


assistant banking commissioner with a felony conviction, as provided


for in Section 1408 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


36. Concealing bank transaction, as provided for in Section


1409 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


37. Improper maintenance of accounts or false or deceptive


entries and statements, as provided for in Section 1410 of Title 6


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


38. Payment of penalties and judgments against others, as


provided for in Section 1411 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


39. Embezzlement of bank funds, as provided for in Section 1412


of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 10


40. Circulation of statement or representation for the purpose


of injuring any bank institution, as provided for in Section 1413 of


Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


41. Authorizing, executing, or ratifying a criminal offense, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


42. Violation of any lawful order of the Board or Commissioner,


as provided for in subsection C of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


43. Bank advertising with confusingly similar name, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


44. Using shortened confusingly similar name for advertising,


as provided for in subsection B of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


45. Acquiring another bank but using former name, as provided


for in subsection C of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


46. Non-banking business using confusingly similar name, as


provided for in subsection D of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


47. Registered sex offender providing services in a child care


facility, as provided for in subsection F of Section 404.1 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 11


48. Failure to report child abuse, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


49. Interception of wire, oral, or electronic communication, as


provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


50. Using devices to intercept oral communication, as provided


for in paragraph 2 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


51. Disclosing contents of wire, oral, or electronic


communication, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 176.3 of


Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


52. Using contents of wire, oral, or electronic communication,


as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


53. Removing, injuring, or obstructing telephone line, as


provided for in paragraph 5 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


54. Carrying devices for interception of wire, oral, or


electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section


176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


55. Making devices for interception of wire, oral, or


electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 7 of Section


176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 12


56. Using communication facility in committing felonies, as


provided for in paragraph 8 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


57. Violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, as


provided for in Section 753 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


58. Violation of the Home Repair Fraud Act, as provided for in


Section 765.3 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


59. Conduct closing-out sale without license, as provided for


in Section 767 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


60. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act, as provided


for in Section 776.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


61. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act for


commercial electronic mail, as provided for in Section 776.6 of


Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


62. Conceal or destroy corporation records, as provided for in


Section 16 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


63. Misapplication of funds, as provided for in Section 411 of


Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


64. Solicit funds to secure old age assistance by deception or


fraud, as provided for in Section 553.1 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


65. Inspector, judge, or clerk refusing to extend or enforce


the right to sign and deliver the certificate of election votes, as


provided for in Section 90 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 13


66. Knowing and willful failure or refusal to perform duties,


as provided for in Section 91 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


67. County officer failing to make daily deposit, as provided


for in Section 682 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


68. Use of false or illegal voucher by county official, as


provided for in Section 686 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


69. Gift to influence legislator, as provided for in Section


318 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


70. Legislator receiving payoff for employment of other, as


provided for in Section 321 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


71. Lobbying legislature on contingency fee basis, as provided


for in Section 334 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


72. Furnishing public supplies for profit, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 355 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


73. Purchase public supplies from business that employs family


member or spouse with more than five percent (5%) interest, as


provided for in subsection C of Section 355 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


74. Make false claim against the state, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 358 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


75. Bribing an officer, as provided for in Section 381 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


76. Bribing participant or official in athletic contest, as


provided for in Section 399 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 14


77. Engaging in pattern of criminal offenses, as provided for


in Section 425 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


78. Escape from county or city jail, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


79. Escape from the Department of Corrections or alternative


incarceration, as provided for in subsection B of Section 443 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


80. Escape from juvenile detention facility, as provided for in


subsection E of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


81. Unauthorized entry into penal institution or jail, as


provided for in Section 445 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


82. Preparing false evidence, as provided for in Section 453 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


83. Bribing witness to falsely testify, as provided for in


Section 456 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


84. Larceny or destruction of records by clerk or officer, as


provided for in Section 461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


85. Larceny or destruction of records by person other than


officers, as provided for in Section 462 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


86. Offer forged or false instruments for the record, as


provided for in Section 463 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


87. Perjury, as provided for in Section 491 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 15


88. Contradictory statements as perjury, as provided for in


Section 496 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


89. Perjury by subornation, as provided for in Section 504 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


90. Falsify public record, as provided for in Section 531 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


91. Fortifying access point to place where felony is being


committed, as provided for in Section 540C of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


92. Compounding a crime, as provided for in Section 543 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


93. Substitute a child to deceive a parent or guardian, as


provided for in Section 579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


94. Record, listen to, or observe jury proceedings, as provided


for in Section 588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


95. Abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


96. Neglect of a vulnerable adult, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


97. Procuring an abortion, as provided for in Section 861 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


98. Adultery, as provided for in Section 871 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 16


99. Bigamy, as provided for in Section 881 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


100. Knowingly marrying a bigamist, as provided for in Section


884 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


101. Confidence game by cards, as provided for in Section 954


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


102. Dealing in gambling devices, as provided for in Section


984 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


103. Install communication of gambling information, as provided


for in Section 986 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


104. Dissemination of gambling information, as provided for in


Section 987 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


105. Conspiracy to violate gambling laws, as provided for in


Section 988 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


106. Engaging in prostitution while HIV-infected, as provided


for in subsection B of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


107. Engage in or operate prostitution within one thousand


(1,000) feet of a school or church, as provided for in subsection D


of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


108. Interactive computer service provider failing to remove


child pornography, third or subsequent offense, as provided for in


Section 1040.80 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 17


109. Gain or attempt to gain value from nonconsensual


dissemination of private sexual images, as provided for in


subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


110. Sex offender entering safety zone around school, as


provided for in Section 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


111. Unlawful removal of dead body, as provided for in Section


1161 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


112. Purchasing or receiving dead body, as provided for in


Section 1162 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


113. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in


clandestine manner, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


114. Obscene, threatening, or harassing phone call, second or


subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1172 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


115. Spreading infectious diseases, as provided for in Section


1192 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


116. Altering livestock appearance for exhibition, second or


subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1229 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


117. 116. Unlawfully transport hazardous waste, as provided for


in Section 1230.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 18


118. 117. Unlawful waste management, as provided for in Section


1230.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


119. 118. False statements and acts concerning permits and


waste, as provided for in Section 1230.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


120. 119. Unlawful disposal of hazardous waste, as provided for


in Section 1230.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


121. 120. Attempts to violate the Sabotage Prevention Act, as


provided for in Section 1265.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


122. 121. Carry weapon with intent to injure another, as


provided for in Section 1278 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


123. 122. Teaching, demonstrating, or training use of firearms


in furtherance of riot, as provided for in Section 1320.10 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


124. 123. Delivering fraudulent bill of lading, as provided for


in Section 1411 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


125. 124. Maintaining fraudulent warehouse receipts, as


provided for in Section 1412 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


126. 125. Issuing duplicate bills of lading or warehouse


receipts, as provided for in Section 1414 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


127. 126. Selling goods without consent of holder of bill of


lading, as provided for in Section 1415 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 19


128. 127. Unlawful delivery of goods, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1416 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


129. 128. Burglary in the third degree, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


130. 129. Embezzlement of property, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1451 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


131. 130. Extortion, as provided for in Section 1481 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


132. 131. Extortion induced by threats, as provided for in


Section 1482 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


133. 132. Obtain signatures by extortion, as provided for in


Section 1485 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


134. 133. Extortion by threatening letter, as provided for in


Section 1486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


135. 134. Blackmail, as provided for in Section 1488 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


136. 135. Defrauding hotel, inn, or restaurant, value of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section


1503 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 20


137. 136. Renting motor vehicle with bogus check, value of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section


1521 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


138. 137. Receive money or property by impersonating another,


value from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen


Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of


Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


139. 138. False use of “State Police” with intent to


communicate policing authority, and another is injured, defrauded,


harassed, or vexed, as provided for in subsection G of Section 1533


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


140. 139. Identity theft, as provided for in Section 1533.1 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


141. 140. Felony value – false pretense, bogus check, con game,


valued from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen


Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of


Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


142. 141. Two or more false or bogus checks, valued from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


143. 142. Obtaining money or property with false negotiable


paper, as provided for in Section 1544 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 21


144. 143. Signs credit or debit card with intent to defraud, as


provided for in subsection (a) of Section 1550.28 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


145. 144. Possess credit or debit card of another with intent


to defraud, as provided for in subsection (b) of Section 1550.28 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


146. 145. Possessing incomplete credit cards with intent to


complete, as provided for in Section 1550.31 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


147. 146. Possess firearm with altered ID during commission of


a felony, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1550 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


148. 147. Make, sell, or display false identification for


felony purposes or to mislead police officer, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1550.41 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


149. 148. Forgery of state, public, court, or corporate seals,


as provided for in Section 1571 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


150. 149. Forgery of records, as provided for in Section 1572


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


151. 150. Making false entry in records, as provided for in


Section 1573 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 22


152. 151. Forgery of certification or acknowledgement of


conveyance, as provided for in Section 1574 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


153. 152. Forgery II / Forgery III, valued from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1577 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


154. 153. Possession of forged evidence of debt, valued from


Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


155. 154. Possession of other forged instrument, valued from


Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


156. 155. Issuing spurious or false certificates of stock, as


provided for in Section 1580 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


157. 156. Reissuing canceled certificates of stock, as provided


for in Section 1581 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


158. 157. Issuing or pledging false evidence of debt, as


provided for in Section 1582 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


159. 158. Counterfeiting coin, as provided for in Section 1583


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 23


160. 159. Counterfeiting coin for exportation, as provided for


in Section 1584 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


161. 160. Forging process of court or title to property, as


provided for in Section 1585 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


162. 161. Making false entries in public book, as provided for


in Section 1586 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


163. 162. Forging tickets of passage, as provided for in


Section 1587 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


164. 163. Forging postage stamps, as provided for in Section


1588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


165. 164. Falsification of corporate records, as provided for


in Section 1589 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


166. 165. Employee making false entries, as provided for in


Section 1590 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


167. 166. Possessing counterfeit coin with intent to circulate,


as provided for in Section 1591 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


168. 167. Uttering forged instruments, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1592 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


169. 168. Falsely procuring another’s signature, as provided


for in Section 1593 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 24


170. 169. Utter signature of another with same name, as


provided for in Section 1622 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


171. 170. Uttering one’s endorsement as another’s, as provided


for in Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


172. 171. Erasure or alterations with intent to defraud, as


provided for in Section 1624 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


173. 172. Sign fictitious name as officer of corporation, as


provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


174. 173. Fraudulent insolvency of corporation, as provided for


in Section 1639 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


175. 174. Workers’ compensation fraud, as provided for in


Section 1663 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


176. 175. Willfully poisoning animal, as provided for in


Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


177. 176. Larceny of lost property, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1702 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


178. 177. Grand larceny, value from Two Thousand Five Hundred


Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as


provided for in subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


179. 178. Larceny of written instrument, as provided for in


Section 1709 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 25


180. 179. Receive, possess, or conceal stolen property, value


from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen


Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of


Section 1713 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


181. 180. Bringing stolen property into state, value from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1715 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


182. 181. Larceny of dogs, as provided for in Section 1718 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


183. 182. Larceny of or receiving stolen fowls, as provided for


in Section 1719 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


184. 183. Larceny of domesticated fish or game, value One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section


1719.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


185. 184. Larceny of auto, aircraft, or other motor vehicle,


value less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for


in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


186. 185. Larceny from building or house, as provided for in


Section 1723 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


187. 186. Possession of mercury, as provided for in Section


1726 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


188. 187. Entering with intent to steal copper, as provided for


in Section 1727 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 26


189. 188. Possessing, receiving, or transporting stolen copper,


as provided for in Section 1728 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


190. 189. Larceny of merchandise from retailer, value from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section


1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


191. 190. Larceny of trade secrets, value from Two Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1732 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


192. 191. Procuring, selling, or receiving telephone records by


fraud (single telephone record), as provided for in subsection A of


Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


193. 192. Injury to or obstruction of railroad, as provided for


in Section 1751 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


194. 193. Interfering with railroad, as provided for in Section


1752.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


195. 194. Possess, use, manufacture, or threaten to use


incendiary device or explosives without injury, as provided for in


Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


196. 195. Removing or injuring piles securing bank or dam, as


provided for in Section 1777 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 27


197. 196. Maliciously injuring written instrument, value from


Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


198. 197. Place hard object or inflammable object in grain or


cotton, as provided for in Section 1837 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


199. 198. Selling five or more unlawful telecommunication


devices within six (6) months, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 1873 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


200. 199. Manufacturing five or more unlawful


telecommunications devices within six (6) months, as provided for in


subsection B of Section 1874 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


201. 200. Unauthorized removal of baggage or cargo from bus or


terminal, as provided for in Section 1904 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


202. 201. Access computer system or network with unlawful


intent, as provided for in Section 1958 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


203. 202. Reproduction of sound recording without consent, one


hundred (100) or more articles, as provided for in Section 1976 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


204. 203. Unlawfully sell sound recordings, as provided for in


Section 1977 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 28


205. 204. Broadcast or live recording for sale without consent,


as provided for in Section 1978 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


206. 205. Rent or sell articles without true name of


manufacturer, as provided for in Section 1979 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


207. 206. Counterfeiting recording or article label, as


provided for in Section 1980 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


208. 207. Violation of Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, as


provided for in Section 1990.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


209. 208. Tampering with security equipment, as provided for in


Section 1993 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


210. 209. Sex offender engaging in ice cream truck vending, as


provided for in Section 2100.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


211. 210. Protective order violation, second or subsequent


offense, as provided for in subsection A of Section 60.6 of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


212. 211. Protective order violation resulting in physical


injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 60.6 of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


213. 212. Disposal of seized liquor by officer, as provided for


in Section 1263 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


214. 213. False affidavits, as provided for in Section 1264 of


Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 29


215. 214. Interfering with voting machine, as provided for in


Section 9-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


216. 215. Voting illegally, as provided for in Section 16-102


of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


217. 216. Removing ballot from or carrying ballot into polling


place, as provided for in Section 16-102.1 of Title 26 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


218. 217. False application for an absentee ballot, as provided


for in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


219. 218. False affidavit in voting registration, as provided


for in Section 16-103 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


220. 219. Causing unqualified persons to be invalidly


registered, as provided for in Section 16-103.1 of Title 26 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


221. 220. False notarization of absentee ballot, as provided


for in Section 16-104 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


222. 221. Perpetrate fraud or theft to affect election, as


provided for in Section 16-105 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


223. 222. Bribes to influence votes, as provided for in Section


16-106 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


224. 223. Offer bribe to withdraw as candidate, as provided for


in Section 16-107 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 480 Page 30


225. 224. Solicit or accept bribe for withdrawal of candidacy,


as provided for in Section 16-108 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


226. 225. Prevent person from registering to vote or voting, as


provided for in Section 16-109 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


227. 226. Printing or possession of ballots illegally, as


provided for in Section 16-120 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


228. 227. Violation of the Oklahoma Pollutant Discharge


Elimination System Act, as provided for in subsection G of Section


2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


229. 228. Falsely state information to the Department of


Environmental Quality, as provided for in Section 2-7-109 of Title


27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


230. 229. Falsify information on permit application for


Oklahoma Solid Waste Management Act, as provided for in Section 2-


10-302 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


231. 230. Violation of use of solid waste disposal sites, as


provided for in Section 2-10-801 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


232. 231. Filing false sale with Insurance Commissioner, as


provided for in Section 311.1 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


233. 232. Selling insurance with revoked or suspended license,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 31


234. 233. Aiding or conspiring with a person whose insurance


license is revoked or suspended, as provided for in subsection B of


Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


235. 234. False statements, reports, or filings with intent to


deceive Insurance Commissioner, as provided for in subsection E of


Section 1643 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


236. 235. Violation of the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008,


value from Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to Two Thousand Five


Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as provided for in subsection F of


Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


237. 236. Violation of prepaid funeral provisions, as provided


for in Section 6130 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


238. 237. Out-of-state retailer shipping alcoholic beverages


into state, as provided for in Section 3-101 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


239. 238. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or


consume alcohol, as provided for in subsection A of Section 6-101 of


Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


240. 239. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or


consume alcohol resulting in great bodily injury or death, as


provided for in subsection C of Section 6-101 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 480 Page 32


241. 240. Sale of alcoholic beverages outside of authorized day


or hours, as provided for in Section 6-123 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


242. 241. Disclosing confidential information concerning


violation of Employment Security Act of 1980, as provided for in


Section 4-508 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


243. 242. Hiring armed guards without permit, as provided for


in Section 169 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


244. 243. Causing employee death by commanding to enter steam


boiler, as provided for in Section 183 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


245. 244. False statement about lien by contractor, as provided


for in Section 142.4 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


246. 245. Mechanics liens/embezzlement, valued from Two


Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand


Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 142.6 of Title 42


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


247. 246. Marrying prohibited persons, as provided for in


Section 14 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


248. 247. Bigamy and remarriage, as provided for in Section 123


of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


249. 248. Mistreatment of mental health patient, as provided


for in Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 33


250. 249. Violation of opioid substitution treatment program,


as provided for in Section 3-601 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


251. 250. Coerce another to execute a declaration of revocation


of an advanced directive, as provided for in subsection D of Section


11-113 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


252. 251. Unauthorized use of implement of husbandry, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 4-102 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


253. 252. Receive, possess, or conceal implement of husbandry,


as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-103 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


254. 253. Removed, falsified, or unauthorized identification,


as provided for in subsection A of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


255. 254. Buy, receive, possess, or sell motor vehicle with VIN


removed or defaced with intent to conceal, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


256. 255. Destroying, removing, altering, covering, or


counterfeiting trim tag plates, as provided for in Section 4-107a of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


257. 256. Misuse of manufactured home certificate of title, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 34


258. 257. Alter manufactured home certificate of title, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


259. 258. Remove receipt with intent to misrepresent payment of


tax or fees, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of


Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


260. 259. Purchase registration receipt on assigned certificate


of title, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


261. 260. Misuse of forged, counterfeit, or suspended driver


license, as provided for in Section 6-301 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


262. 261. Perjury through false affidavit, as provided for in


Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


263. 262. Interference with traffic control device resulting in


injury or death, as provided for in subsection B of Section 11-207


of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


264. 263. Buy, sell, or dispose vehicle with altered VIN, chop


shop, as provided for in subsection C of Section 1503 of Title 47 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


265. 264. Attempt to violate chop shop laws, as provided for in


subsection D of Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


266. 265. Perjury before the Corporation Commission, as


provided for in Section 108 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 35


267. 266. Delay probation duties of the Corporation Commission


with use or attempted use of firearms, as provided for in Section


114 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


268. 267. Conspiracy to violate Oklahoma Oil and Gas


Conservation Act, as provided for in Section 115 of Title 52 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


269. 268. Corruption of Corporation Commission, as provided for


in Section 117 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


270. 269. Misappropriation of gas, as provided for in Section


235 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


271. 270. Falsification of application for emergency relief, as


provided for in Section 26.18 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


272. 271. Medicaid fraud, as provided for in Section 1005 of


Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


273. 272. Fraudulently obtaining or receiving assistance, value


of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, as provided for in


Section 1005.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


274. 273. Carry contraband into jail or prison, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


275. 274. Possess cell phone in jail or prison, as provided for


in subsection E of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


276. 275. Jail employee receiving compensation from inmate,


value of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in


Section 22 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 36


277. 276. Use of convict labor on private property, as provided


for in Section 222 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


278. 277. Failure to comply with Mary Rippy Violent Crime


Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in Section 599 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


279. 278. Practicing dentistry without a license, as provided


for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


280. 279. Giving false information to obtain license, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


281. 280. Impersonating a pharmacist, as provided for in


Section 353.17A of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


282. 281. Alteration of prescription or unlawful dispensing of


drugs, second violation, as provided for in Section 353.24 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


283. 282. False representation in procuring license under the


Oklahoma Pharmacy Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section


353.25 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


284. 283. Cremation without license and permit, as provided for


in Section 396.33 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


285. 284. Practicing medicine without a license, as provided


for in Section 491 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 37


286. 285. Violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,


as provided for in Section 638 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


287. 286. Acting as building inspector without a license, as


provided for in Section 1044 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


288. 287. Affidavit as to undertaking, as provided for in


Section 1322 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


289. 288. Bail jumping, as provided for in Section 1335 of


Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


290. 289. False declaration of ownership in pawn shop, value of


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, if property is firearms,


or was acquired through robbery or burglary, as provided for in


subsection C of Section 1512 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


291. 290. Violation of Oklahoma Security Guard and Private


Investigator Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1750.11


of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


292. 291. Collusion among bidders, as provided for in Section


115 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


293. 292. Disclosure of terms of bids, as provided for in


Section 116 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


294. 293. False or illegal voucher by public official, as


provided for in Section 81 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


295. 294. Use of facsimile signature or seal with intent to


defraud, as provided for in Section 604 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 38


296. 295. Distribution of controlled substance, possession with


intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided for in subsection


A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


297. 296. Distribution of counterfeit controlled substance,


possession with intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided


for in subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


298. 297. Robbery of controlled dangerous substance, as


provided for in subsection B of Section 2-403 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


299. 298. Distribute or dispense controlled substance without


required order form, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-


404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


300. 299. Manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled


substance not authorized by registration, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


301. 300. Omit, remove, alter, or obliterate symbol required on


controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-


404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


302. 301. Refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish required


information, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of


Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;





Req. No. 480 Page 39


303. 302. Refuse entry or inspection of premises with respect


to controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section


2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


304. 303. Maintain place for keeping or selling controlled


substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


305. 304. Sell, transfer, or provide money transmitter


equipment to unlicensed person, second or subsequent offense, as


provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


306. 305. Responsibility of permit holders, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


307. 306. Purchase or sell body parts for transplantation, as


provided for in Section 2200.16A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


308. 307. Falsification, forgery, concealment, defacement, or


obliteration of document of gift, as provided for in Section


2200.17A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


309. 308. Unlawful possession of vessel or motor, as provided


for in Section 4209 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


310. 309. Receive, possess, sell, or dispose of stolen vessel


or motor, as provided for in Section 4209.1 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 40


311. 310. Remove or alter ID number of vessel, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


312. 311. Buy, receive, possess, or dispose of vessel with


false ID number with intent to conceal, as provided for in


subsection D of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


313. 312. False statement in application for certificate of


title for stolen vehicle, as provided for in Section 4209.3 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


314. 313. Alteration or forging of vessel certificate of title,


as provided for in Section 4209.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


315. 314. Possess vessel with altered ID number, as provided


for in subsection C of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


316. 315. Destroying or falsifying checks to the Land Office,


as provided for in Section 1026 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


317. 316. Prospecting on public lands without permit, as


provided for in Section 1094 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


318. 317. Business for profit by a member of the Department of


Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 304 of


Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 41


319. 318. Business for profit by a member of the Department of


Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 324 of


Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


320. 319. Failure to comply with request for county records, as


provided for in Section 83 of Title 67 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


321. 320. Refusal to file tax return with intent to defraud, as


provided for in Section 240.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


322. 321. Filing false sales tax report, as provided for in


Section 241 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


323. 322. Possession of controlled dangerous substances without


tax stamp, as provided for in Section 450.8 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


324. 323. Remove tax stamp with intent to reuse, as provided


for in Section 450.9 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


325. 324. Making false oath to report required by Cotton


Manufacturers Act, as provided for in Section 2003 of Title 68 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


326. 325. File false income tax return with intent to defraud,


as provided for in Section 2376 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


327. 326. Fraudulent tax receipt by county treasurer, as


provided for in Section 2920 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


328. 327. False or fraudulent lists of taxable property, as


provided for in Section 2945 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 42


329. 328. False application under Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program


Act, as provided for in Section 3609 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


330. 329. False application under Former Military Facility


Development Act, as provided for in Section 3807 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


331. 330. False application under Oklahoma Specialized Quality


Investment Act, as provided for in Section 4109 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


332. 331. False application under Oklahoma Quality Investment


Act, as provided for in Section 4209 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


333. 332. Conflict of interest by a member of the


Transportation Commission, as provided for in Section 310 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


334. 333. Conflict of interest by a member of the Oklahoma


Turnpike Authority, as provided for in Section 1705 of Title 69 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


335. 334. Violation of Oklahoma Highway Code of 1968, as


provided for in Section 1802 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


336. 335. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Educational


Television Authority member, as provided for in Section 23-106 of


Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 43


337. 336. Alter or destroy audit records by Board of Regents,


as provided for in subsection E of Section 3909 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


338. 337. Authority to receive gifts or funds, as provided for


in subsection B of Section 4306 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


339. 338. Make takeover offer which is not effective under


Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of 1985, as provided for in


subsection A of Section 453 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


340. 339. Fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative acts in


takeover offer, as provided for in Section 455 of Title 71 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


341. 340. Violation of Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of


1985, as provided for in Section 460 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


342. 341. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Capitol Improvement


Authority member, as provided for in Section 162 of Title 73 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


343. 342. Fraud in obtaining certification as a minority


business, as provided for in Section 85.45h of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


344. 343. False statement for small business surety bond


guarantee, as provided for in Section 85.47h of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 44


345. 344. Forge or alter criminal history record, as provided


for in subsection D of Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


346. 345. Making or receiving kickback, as provided for in


Section 3404 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


347. 346. Pooling of bridge or highway contracts, as provided


for in Section 101 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


348. 347. Business for profit by Water Resources Board member,


as provided for in Section 1086.3 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


349. 348. Conflict of interest by water district official or


employee, as provided for in Section 1281 of Title 82 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


350. 349. Falsely executes a written declaration as a witness


to a will, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section 55 of Title 84


of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


351. 350. False statement and misrepresentation, as provided


for in Section 6 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. Any person convicted of a Class D1 criminal offense set


forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than


five (5) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the


sentence imposed before release from custody including release to



Req. No. 480 Page 45


electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of


one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class D1


criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment


in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not


less than one (1) year nor more than seven (7) years and shall serve


at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release


from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to


Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three


Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class


A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D1 criminal offense


shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody


of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)


years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve at least thirty


percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody


including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9


of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of


this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes


shall not apply to Class D1 criminal offenses.


E. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 98, 108, 212,


213, and 229 of subsection A of this section shall be exempt from

Req. No. 480 Page 46


the penalty provisions provided for in subsections B and C of this


section. Persons convicted of the criminal offenses provided for in


paragraphs 98, 108, 212, 213, and 229 of subsection A of this


section shall be punished in accordance with the corresponding


penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section


51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


F. All Class D1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the


corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1192.2 of Title 21, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any person who is currently serving a sentence for a


conviction, whether by trial or plea of guilty or nolo contendere,


prior to the effective date of this act, for the following:


1. Spreading infectious diseases as provided in Section 1192 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


2. Knowingly engaging in conduct reasonably likely to transfer


HIV as provided in Section 1192.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes,


may file a petition for resentencing, reversal of conviction and


dismissal of case, or modification of judgment and sentence before


the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in the


person’s case to request resentencing, modification, or reversal of


the conviction and sentence.

Req. No. 480 Page 47


B. 1. A person whose sentence is modified pursuant to this


section shall be given credit for time served. Resentencing


pursuant to this section shall not result in the imposition of a


term longer than the original sentence.


2. Upon a sentence modification pursuant to this section, the


court shall order all applicable court and law enforcement records


relating to the addressed conviction be modified to reflect the new


sentence.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 138, as


amended by Section 11, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2024 (57 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 138), is amended to read as follows:


Section 138. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, every


inmate of a state correctional institution shall have their his or


her term of imprisonment reduced monthly, based upon the class level


to which they are assigned. Earned credits may be subtracted from


the total credits accumulated by an inmate, upon recommendation of


the institution’s disciplinary committee, following due process, and


upon approval of the warden or superintendent. Each earned credit


is equivalent to one (1) day of incarceration. Lost credits may be


restored by the warden or superintendent upon approval of the


classification committee. If a maximum and minimum term of


imprisonment is imposed, the provisions of this subsection shall


apply only to the maximum term. No deductions shall be credited to


any inmate serving a sentence of life imprisonment; however, a

Req. No. 480 Page 48


complete record of the inmate’s participation in work, school,


vocational training, or other approved program shall be maintained


by the Department of Corrections for consideration by the paroling


authority. No earned credit deductions shall be credited or


recorded for any inmate serving any sentence for a criminal act


which resulted in the death of a police officer, a law enforcement


officer, an employee of the Department of Corrections, or an


employee of a private prison contractor and the death occurred while


the police officer, law enforcement officer, employee of the


Department of Corrections, or employee of a private prison


contractor was acting within the scope of their his or her


employment. No earned credit deductions shall be credited or


recorded for any person who is referred to an intermediate


revocation facility for violating any of the terms and conditions of


probation.


B. The Department of Corrections is directed to develop a


written policy and procedure whereby inmates shall be assigned to


one of four class levels determined by an adjustment review


committee of the facility to which the inmate is assigned. The


policies and procedures developed by the Department shall include,


but not be limited to, written guidelines pertaining to awarding


credits for rehabilitation, obtaining job skills and educational


enhancement, participation in and completion of alcohol/chemical


abuse programs, incentives for inmates to accept work assignments

Req. No. 480 Page 49


and jobs, work attendance and productivity, conduct record,


participation in programs, cooperative general behavior, and


appearance. When assigning inmates to a class level, the adjustment


review committee shall consider all aspects of the policy and


procedure developed by the Department including, but not limited to,


the criteria for awarding credits required by this subsection.


C. If an inmate is subject to misconduct, nonperformance, or


disciplinary action, earned credits may be removed according to the


policies and procedures developed by the Department. Earned credits


removed for misconduct, nonperformance, or disciplinary action may


be restored as provided by Department policy, if any.


D. 1. Class levels shall be as follows:


a. Class level 1 shall include inmates not eligible to


participate in class levels 2 through 4, and shall


include, but not be limited to, inmates on escape


status.


b. Class level 2 shall include an inmate who has been


given a work, education, or program assignment, has


received a good evaluation for participation in the


work, education, or program assignment, and has


received a good evaluation for personal hygiene and


maintenance of living area.


c. Class level 3 shall include an inmate who has been


incarcerated at least three (3) months, has received

Req. No. 480 Page 50


an excellent work, education, or program evaluation,


and has received an excellent evaluation for personal


hygiene and maintenance of living area.


d. Class level 4 shall include an inmate who has been


incarcerated at least eight (8) months, has received


an outstanding work, education, or program evaluation,


and has received an outstanding evaluation for


personal hygiene and maintenance of living area.


2. a. Until November 1, 2001, class level corresponding


credits are as follows:


Class 1 - 0 Credits per month;


Class 2 - 22 Credits per month;


Class 3 - 33 Credits per month;


Class 4 - 44 Credits per month.


b. Class level corresponding credits beginning November


1, 2001, for inmates who have ever been convicted as


an adult or a youthful offender or adjudicated


delinquent as a juvenile for a felony offense


enumerated in subsection E of this section are as


follows:


Class 1 - 0 Credits per month;


Class 2 - 22 Credits per month;


Class 3 - 33 Credits per month;


Class 4 - 44 Credits per month.

Req. No. 480 Page 51


c. Class level corresponding credits beginning November


1, 2001, for inmates who have never been convicted as


an adult or a youthful offender or adjudicated


delinquent as a juvenile for a felony offense


enumerated in subsection E of this section are as


follows:


Class 1 – 0 Credits per month;


Class 2 – 22 Credits per month;


Class 3 – 45 Credits per month;


Class 4 – 60 Credits per month.


Each inmate shall receive the above specified monthly credits


for the class to which he or she is assigned. In determining the


prior criminal history of the inmate, the Department of Corrections


shall review criminal history records available through the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Investigation, Federal Bureau of Investigation, and


National Crime Information Center to determine the reported felony


convictions of all inmates. The Department of Corrections shall


also review the Office of Juvenile Affairs Juvenile On-line Online


Tracking System for inmates who were adjudicated delinquent or


convicted as a youthful offender for a crime that would be an


offense enumerated in subsection E of this section.


3. In addition to the criteria established for each class in


paragraph 1 of this subsection, the following requirements shall


apply to each of levels 2 through 4:

Req. No. 480 Page 52


a. satisfactory participation in the work, education, or


program assignment at the standard required for the


particular class level,


b. maintenance of a clean and orderly living area and


personal hygiene at the standard required for the


particular class level,


c. cooperative behavior toward facility staff and other


inmates, and


d. satisfactory participation in the requirements of the


previous class level.


4. The evaluation scale for assessing performance shall be as


follows:


a. Outstanding - For inmates who display consistently


exceptional initiative, motivation, and work habits.


b. Excellent - For inmates who display above-average work


habits with only minor errors and rarely perform below


expectations.


c. Good - For inmates who perform in a satisfactory


manner and complete tasks as required, doing what is


expected, with only occasional performance above or


below expectations.


d. Fair - For inmates who may perform satisfactorily for


some periods of time, but whose performance is marked



Req. No. 480 Page 53


by obviously deficient and weak areas and could be


improved.


e. Poor - For inmates whose performance is unsatisfactory


and falls below expected and acceptable standards.


E. No person ever convicted as an adult or a youthful offender


or adjudicated delinquent as a juvenile in this state for any felony


offense enumerated in this subsection or a similar felony offense


pursuant to the provisions of another state, the United States, or a


military court shall be eligible for the credits provided by the


provisions of subparagraph c of paragraph 2 of subsection D of this


section. Such enumerated offenses include:


1. Assault, battery, or assault and battery with a dangerous


weapon as defined by Section 645, subsection C of Section 652 of


Title 21, or Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. Aggravated assault and battery on a police officer, sheriff,


highway patrolman, or any other officer of the law as defined by


Section 650, subsection C of Section 650.2, Section 650.5,


subsection B of Section 650.6, or subsection C of Section 650.7 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Poisoning with intent to kill as defined by Section 651 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


4. Shooting with intent to kill as defined by Section 652 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 54


5. Assault with intent to kill as defined by Section 653 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


6. Assault with intent to commit a felony as defined by Section


681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


7. Assaults while masked or disguised as defined by Section


1303 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


8. Entering premises of another while masked as defined by


Section 1302 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


9. Murder in the first degree as defined by Section 701.7 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. Solicitation for Murder murder in the first degree as


defined by Section 701.16 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


11. Murder in the second degree as defined by Section 701.8 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


12. Manslaughter in the first degree as defined by Section 711


or 712 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


13. Manslaughter in the second degree as defined by Section 716


or 717 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


14. Kidnapping as defined by Section 741 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


15. Burglary in the first degree as defined by Section 1431 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


16. Burglary with explosives as defined by Section 1441 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 55


17. Kidnapping for extortion as defined by Section 745 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


18. Maiming as defined by Section 751 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


19. Robbery as defined by Section 791 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


20. Robbery in the first degree as defined by Section 797 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


21. Robbery in the second degree as defined by Section 797 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


22. Armed robbery as defined by Section 801 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


23. Robbery by two or more persons as defined by Section 800 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


24. Robbery with dangerous weapon or imitation firearm as


defined by Section 801 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


25. Any crime against a child provided for in Section 843.5 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


26. Wiring any equipment, or equipping any vehicle or structure


with explosives as defined by Section 849 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


27. Forcible sodomy as defined by Section 888 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 56


28. Rape in the first degree as defined by Sections 1111 and


1114 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


29. Rape in the second degree as defined by Sections 1111 and


1114 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


30. Rape by instrumentation as defined by Section 1111.1 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


31. Lewd or indecent proposition or lewd or indecent act with a


child as defined by Section 1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


32. Sexual battery of a person over 16 as defined by Section


1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


33. Use of a firearm or offensive weapon to commit or attempt


to commit a felony as defined by Section 1287 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


34. Pointing firearms as defined by Section 1289.16 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


35. Rioting as defined by Section 1311 or 1321.8 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


36. Inciting to riot as defined by Section 1320.2 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


37. Arson in the first degree as defined by Section 1401 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


38. Endangering human life during arson as defined by Section


1405 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 57


39. Injuring or burning public buildings as defined by Section


349 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


40. Sabotage as defined by Section 1262, 1265.4 or 1265.5 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


41. Extortion as defined by Section 1481 or 1486 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes;


42. Obtaining signature by extortion as defined by Section 1485


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


43. Seizure of a bus, discharging firearm or hurling missile at


bus as defined by Section 1903 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


44. Mistreatment of a vulnerable adult as defined by Section


843.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


45. Sex offender providing services to a child as defined by


Section 404.1 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


46. A felony offense of domestic abuse as defined by subsection


C of Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


47. Prisoner placing body fluid on government employee as


defined by Section 650.9 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


48. Poisoning food or water supply as defined by Section 832 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


49. Trafficking in children as defined by Section 866 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


50. Incest as defined by Section 885 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;

Req. No. 480 Page 58


51. Procure, produce, distribute, or possess juvenile


pornography child sexual abuse material as defined by Section 1021.2


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


52. Parental consent to juvenile pornography child sexual abuse


material as defined by Section 1021.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


53. Soliciting minor for indecent exposure as defined by


Section 1021 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


54. Distributing obscene material or child pornography sexual


abuse material as defined by Section 1040.13 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


55. Child sex trafficking as defined by Section 1030 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes;


56. Procuring a minor for child sex trafficking or other lewd


acts as defined by Section 1087 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


57. Transporting a child under eighteen (18) years of age for


purposes of child sex trafficking as defined by Section 1087 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


58. Inducing a minor to engage in child sex trafficking as


defined by Section 1088 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


59. A felony offense of stalking as defined by subsection D of


Section 1173 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;



Req. No. 480 Page 59


60. Spread of infectious diseases as defined by Section 1192 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


61. Advocate overthrow of government by force, commit or


attempt to commit acts to overthrow the government, organize or


provide assistance to groups to overthrow the government as defined


by Section 1266, 1266.4 or 1267.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


62. 61. Feloniously discharging a firearm as defined by Section


1289.17A of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


63. 62. Possession, use, manufacture, or threat of incendiary


device as defined by Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


64. 63. Causing a personal injury accident while driving under


the influence as defined by Section 11-904 of Title 47 of the


Oklahoma Statutes; or


65. 64. Using a motor vehicle to facilitate the discharge of a


firearm as defined by Section 652 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


F. The policy and procedure developed by the Department of


Corrections shall include provisions for adjustment review


committees of not less than three members for each such committee.


Each committee shall consist of a classification team supervisor who


shall act as chairman, the case manager for the inmate being


reviewed or classified, a correctional officer or inmate counselor,

Req. No. 480 Page 60


and not more than two other members, if deemed necessary, determined


pursuant to policy and procedure to be appropriate for the specific


adjustment review committee or committees to which they are


assigned. At least once every four (4) months the adjustment review


committee for each inmate shall evaluate the class level status and


performance of the inmate and determine whether or not the class


level for the inmate should be changed.


Any inmate who feels aggrieved by a decision made by an


adjustment review committee may utilize normal grievance procedures


in effect with the Department of Corrections and in effect at the


facility in which the inmate is incarcerated.


G. Inmates granted medical leaves for treatment that cannot be


furnished at the penal institution where incarcerated shall be


allowed the time spent on medical leave as time served. Any inmate


placed into administrative segregation for nondisciplinary reasons


by the institution’s administration may be placed in Class 2. The


length of any jail term served by an inmate before being transported


to a state correctional institution pursuant to a judgment and


sentence of incarceration shall be deducted from the term of


imprisonment at the state correctional institution. Inmates


sentenced to the Department of Corrections and detained in a county


jail as a result of the Department’s reception scheduling procedure


shall be awarded earned credits as provided for in subparagraph b of


paragraph 1 of subsection D of this section, beginning on the date

Req. No. 480 Page 61


of the judgment and sentence, unless the inmate is convicted of a


misdemeanor or felony committed in the jail while the inmate is


awaiting transport to the Lexington Assessment and Reception Center


or other assessment and reception location determined by the


Director of the Department of Corrections.


H. Additional achievement earned credits for successful


completion of departmentally approved programs or for attaining


goals or standards set by the Department shall be awarded as


follows:


Bachelor’s degree......................200 credits;


Associate’s degree.....................100 credits;


High School Diploma or High School


Equivalency Diploma...................90 credits;


Certification of Completion of


Vocational Training...................80 credits;


Successful completion of


Alcohol/Chemical Abuse Treatment


Program of not less than four (4)


months continuous participation.......70 credits;


Successful completion of other


Educational Accomplishments or


other programs not specified in


this subsection....................10-30 credits;



Req. No. 480 Page 62


Achievement earned credits are subject to loss and restoration in


the same manner as earned credits.


I. The accumulated time of every inmate shall be tallied


monthly and maintained by the institution where the term of


imprisonment is being served. A record of said such accumulated


time shall be:


1. Sent to the administrative office of the Department of


Corrections on a quarterly basis; and


2. Provided to the inmate.


SECTION 5. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Sections 1192 and


1192.1, is hereby repealed.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-480 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:09 AM





















Req. No. 480 Page 63